tests/verbs-nonfinite.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "{A}р":
    бар<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : барар
    санаа<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : саныыр
    бар<v><iv><ger_aor><nom> : барар
    санаа<v><tv><ger_aor><nom> : саныыр
    бар<v><iv><gpr_aor> : барар
    санаа<v><tv><gpr_aor> : саныыр

  "{B}{A}т":
    бар<v><iv><neg><aor><p3><sg> : барбат
    санаа<v><tv><neg><aor><p3><sg> : санаабат
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_aor><nom> : барбат
    санаа<v><tv><neg><ger_aor><nom> : санаабат
    бар<v><iv><neg><gpr_aor> : барбат
    санаа<v><tv><neg><gpr_aor> : санаабат

  "{B}{I}т":
    бар<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : барбыта
    санаа<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : санаабыта
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><nom> : барбыт
    санаа<v><tv><ger_past><nom> : санаабыт
    бар<v><iv><gpr_past> : барбыт
    санаа<v><tv><gpr_past> : санаабыт

  "{B}{A}т{A}х":
    бар<v><iv><neg><past><p3><sg> : барбатаҕа
    санаа<v><tv><neg><past><p3><sg> : санаабатаҕа
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><nom> : барбатах      # CHECK
    санаа<v><tv><neg><ger_past><nom> : санаабатах  # CHECK
    бар<v><iv><neg><gpr_past> : барбатах           # CHECK
    санаа<v><tv><neg><gpr_past> : санаабатах       # CHECK

  "{I}{A}х":
    бар<v><iv><fut><p3><sg> : барыаҕа
    буол<v><iv><fut><p3><sg> : буолуоҕа
    санаа<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> : саныаҕа
    бар<v><iv><ger_fut><nom> : барыах
    буол<v><iv><ger_fut><nom> : буолуох
    санаа<v><tv><ger_fut><nom> : саныах
    бар<v><iv><gpr_fut> : барыах
    буол<v><iv><gpr_fut> : буолуох
    санаа<v><tv><gpr_fut> : саныах

  "{I}{A}":
    бар<v><iv><ger_pot><nom> : барыа
    буол<v><iv><ger_pot><nom> : буолуо
    санаа<v><tv><ger_pot><nom> : саныа

  "{I}{A}н":
    бар<v><iv><ger_irre><nom> : барыан
    буол<v><iv><ger_irre><nom> : буолуон
    санаа<v><tv><ger_irre><nom> : саныан

  "{T}{A}х":
    бар<v><iv><past><ded><p3><sg> : бардаҕа
    буол<v><iv><past><ded><p3><sg> : буоллаҕа
    санаа<v><tv><past><ded><p3><sg> : санаатаҕа
    бүтэр<v><tv><past><ded><p3><sg> : бүтэрдэҕэ
    бар<v><iv><ger_cond><nom> : бардах
    буол<v><iv><ger_cond><nom> : буоллах
    санаа<v><tv><ger_cond><nom> : санаатах
    бүтэр<v><tv><ger_cond><nom> : бүтэрдэх
    бар<v><iv><ger_cond><px3sg><par> : бардаҕына
    буол<v><iv><ger_cond><px3sg><par> : буоллаҕына
    санаа<v><tv><ger_cond><px3sg><par> : санаатаҕына
    бүтэр<v><tv><ger_cond><px3sg><par> : бүтэрдэҕинэ


  "{A}{A}чч{I}":
    бар<v><iv><hab><p3><sg> : барааччы
    буол<v><iv><hab><p3><sg> : буолааччы
    санаа<v><tv><hab><p3><sg> : санааччы
    бүтэр<v><tv><hab><p3><sg> : бүтэрээччи
    бар<v><iv><ger_hab><nom> : барааччы
    буол<v><iv><ger_hab><nom> : буолааччы
    санаа<v><tv><ger_hab><nom> : санааччы
    бүтэр<v><tv><ger_hab><nom> : бүтэрээччи

  "{A} илик":
    бар<v><iv><unac><p3><sg> : бара илик
    буол<v><iv><unac><p3><sg> : буола илик
    санаа<v><tv><unac><p3><sg> : саныы илик
    бүтэр<v><tv><unac><p3><sg> : бүтэрэ илик
    бар<v><iv><ger_unac><nom> : бара илик
    буол<v><iv><ger_unac><nom> : буола илик
    санаа<v><tv><ger_unac><nom> : саныы илик
    бүтэр<v><tv><ger_unac><nom> : бүтэрэ илик
    бар<v><iv><gpr_unac> : бара илик
    буол<v><iv><gpr_unac> : буола илик
    санаа<v><tv><gpr_unac> : саныы илик
    бүтэр<v><tv><gpr_unac> : бүтэрэ илик

  "{А}н":
    бар<v><iv><gna_perf> : баран
    буол<v><iv><gna_perf> : буолан
    киир<v><iv><gna_perf> : киирэн
    ыа<v><tv><gna_perf> : ыан
    санаа<v><tv><gna_perf> : санаан
    бар<v><iv><prc_perf> : баран
    буол<v><iv><prc_perf> : буолан
    киир<v><iv><prc_perf> : киирэн
    ыа<v><tv><prc_perf> : ыан
    санаа<v><tv><prc_perf> : санаан

  "{А}":
    бар<v><iv><gna_impf> : бара
    буол<v><iv><gna_impf> : буола
    киир<v><iv><gna_impf> : киирэ
    ыа<v><tv><gna_impf> : ыы
    санаа<v><tv><gna_impf> : саныы
    бар<v><iv><prc_impf> : бара
    буол<v><iv><prc_impf> : буола
    киир<v><iv><prc_impf> : киирэ
    ыа<v><tv><prc_impf> : ыы
    санаа<v><tv><prc_impf> : саныы

  "{I}м{I}н{A}":
    бар<v><iv><cert><p3><sg> : барымына
    ыл<v><tv><cert><p3><sg> : ылымына
    санаа<v><tv><cert><p3><sg> : санаамына
    бар<v><iv><neg><gna_perf> : барымына
    ыл<v><tv><neg><gna_perf> : ылымына
    санаа<v><tv><neg><gna_perf> : санаамына
    бар<v><iv><neg><prc_perf> : барымына
    ыл<v><tv><neg><prc_perf> : ылымына
    санаа<v><tv><neg><prc_perf> : санаамына
    бар<v><iv><neg><gna_impf> : барымына
    ыл<v><tv><neg><gna_impf> : ылымына
    санаа<v><tv><neg><gna_impf> : санаамына
    бар<v><iv><neg><prc_impf> : барымына
    ыл<v><tv><neg><prc_impf> : ылымына
    санаа<v><tv><neg><prc_impf> : санаамына

  "{B}{A}кк{A}":
    бар<v><iv><abes><p3><sg> : барбакка
    бар<v><iv><abes><p1><sg> : барбаккабын
    тэһий<v><iv><abes><p3><sg> : тэһийбэккэ
    тэһий<v><iv><abes><p1><sg> : тэһийбэккэбин
    бар<v><iv><gna_abes> : барбакка
    тэһий<v><iv><gna_abes> : тэһийбэккэ

  "{a}{a}р{I}":
    бар<v><iv><gna_plan> : бараары
    диэ<v><tv><gna_plan> : диэри
    бар<v><iv><gna_plan><p3><sg> : бараары
    диэ<v><tv><gna_plan><p3><sg> : диэри
    бар<v><iv><gna_plan><p1><sg> : бараарыбын
    диэ<v><tv><gna_plan><p1><sg> : диэрибин
